Nevada, session 83, SB229.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388.5962 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388.5962 A school district, charter school and university
school for profoundly gifted pupils that participates in the State Seal
of Financial Literacy Program established pursuant to NRS 388.596
must award a pupil, upon graduation from high school, a high
school diploma with a State Seal of Financial Literacy if the pupil:
1. Earns at least a [3.25] 3.0 grade point average, on a 4.0
grading scale, or a [3.85] 3.0 weighted grade point average, on a
grading scale approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
if a different grading scale is used.
2. Demonstrates proficiency in financial literacy by : [earning:]
(a) [At] Earning at least 3 credits in a [subject area in] course
of career and technical education, mathematics or social studies
-
*SB229_R1*

– 3 –
which [instruction on] relates to financial literacy ; [is provided;]
and
(b) [Either] Meeting one of the following [:] conditions:
(1) [A] Earning a grade of B or higher in a college-level
course , including, without limitation, a dual credit course, in
which instruction on financial literacy is provided; [or]
(2) [A] Earning a score of [gold or higher] at least 85
percent on [the ACT National Career Readiness Certificate.] a
financial literacy assessment provided by the Department; or
(3) Completing an objective test, exam or project which
relates to financial literacy and is provided by a career and
technical student organization which is affiliated with a state or
national organization, including, without limitation, the Personal
Finance test provided by the Future Business Leaders of America,
or its successor organization, or the Personal Financial Literacy
Exam provided by DECA Inc., or its successor organization.
Sec. 2. NRS 389.074 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.074 1. The board of trustees of each school district and
the governing body of each charter school shall ensure that
instruction in financial literacy is provided to pupils enrolled in
kindergarten and grades [3] 1 to 12, inclusive, in each public
school within the school district or in the charter school, as
applicable. The instruction must include, without limitation:
(a) The skills necessary to develop financial responsibility,
including, without limitation:
(1) Making reasonable financial decisions by analyzing the
alternatives and consequences of those financial decisions;
(2) Locating and evaluating financial information from
various sources;
(3) Judging the quality of services offered by a financial
institution;
(4) Developing communication strategies to discuss financial
issues;
(5) Controlling personal information; and
(6) Reviewing and summarizing federal and state consumer
protection laws.
(b) The skills necessary to manage finances, including, without
limitation:
(1) Developing a plan for spending and saving;
(2) Developing a system for keeping and using financial
records; and
(3) Developing a personal financial plan.
(c) The skills necessary to understand the use of credit and the
incurrence of debt, including, without limitation:
-
*SB229_R1*

– 4 –
(1) Identifying the costs and benefits of various types of
credit;
(2) Understanding the methods to manage debt and the
consequences of acquiring debt;
(3) Understanding how interest rates, compounding
frequency and the terms of a loan can affect the cost of credit;
(4) Completing an application for a loan;
(5) Understanding different types of loans, including, without
limitation, payday loans, automobile loans, student loans and
mortgages;
(6) Explaining the purpose of a credit report, including,
without limitation, the manner in which a credit report is used by
lenders;
(7) Describing the rights of a borrower regarding his or her
credit report;
(8) Identifying methods to avoid and resolve debt problems;
and
(9) Reviewing and summarizing federal and state consumer
credit protection laws.
(d) The skills necessary to understand the basic principles of
saving and investing, including, without limitation:
(1) Understanding how saving and investing contribute to
financial well-being;
(2) Understanding the methods of investing and alternatives
to investing;
(3) Understanding how to buy and sell investments;
(4) Understanding compound interest, including, without
limitation, in the context of investments;
(5) Understanding various types of securities, including,
without limitation, stocks and bonds; and
(6) Understanding how the regulation of financial institutions
protects investors.
(e) The skills necessary to prevent and limit the consequences of
identity theft and fraud.
(f) The skills necessary to understand the basic assessment of
taxes, including, without limitation, understanding the matter in
which taxes are computed by local, state and federal governmental
entities.
(g) The skills necessary to understand the basic principles of
insurance, including, without limitation:
(1) Understanding the function of various insurance policies;
and
(2) Determining the quality of an insurance provider.
(h) The skills necessary to plan for higher education and career
choices, including, without limitation:
-
*SB229_R1*

– 5 –
(1) Information concerning institutions of higher education
and college preparedness;
(2) Information concerning career options;
(3) Writing a resume;
(4) Information concerning opportunities for financial aid,
including the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and the
programs of the Western Interstate Commission for Higher
Education, and the manner in which to qualify for such
opportunities;
(5) Information concerning scholarship opportunities,
including, without limitation, the Governor Guinn Millennium
Scholarship Program and Silver State Opportunity Grant Program;
and
(6) Information concerning prepaid tuition and college
savings programs and plans established pursuant to chapter 353B of
NRS and section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. §
529.
2. The standards of content and performance for the instruction
in financial literacy required by subsection 1 must be included in the
standards of content and performance established by the Council to
Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools pursuant to NRS
389.520. The instruction required by subsection 1 must be:
(a) Age-appropriate; and
(b) Included within a course of study for which the Council has
established the relevant standards of content and performance,
including, without limitation, a course of study in economics,
mathematics or social studies.
3. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school in which pupils are enrolled
in kindergarten or any grade of grades [3] 1 to 12, inclusive, shall
encourage:
(a) Persons to volunteer time, expertise and resources to assist a
school district, governing body of a charter school, public school or
teacher in the provision of instruction in financial literacy; and
(b) Partnerships between a school district or charter school and
relevant persons, businesses or entities in which those persons,
businesses or entities provide the resources necessary to provide
instruction in financial literacy.
Sec. 3. NRS 391A.385 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.385 Each school district and the governing body of a
charter school in which pupils are enrolled in kindergarten or any
grade of grades [3] 1 to 12, inclusive, shall provide professional
development training regarding financial literacy to teachers who
teach in a subject area in which instruction in financial literacy is
provided. Such professional development training may be provided
-
*SB229_R1*

– 6 –
by the school district or governing body or through an agreement
with an institution of higher education or a regional training
program for professional development of teachers and
administrators.
H
-
*SB229_R1*